Utah statutes.
48-1d-103.   Knowledge -- Notice.

(1)  A person knows a fact if the person:

(a)  has actual knowledge of it; or

(b)  is deemed to know it under Subsection (4)(a) or law other than this chapter.

(2)  A person has notice of a fact if the person:

(a)  has reason to know the fact from all the facts known to the person at the time in question; or

(b)  is deemed to have notice of the fact under Subsection (4)(b).

(3)  Subject to Subsection 48-1d-116(6), a person notifies another person of a fact by taking steps reasonably required to inform the other person in ordinary course, whether or not those steps cause the other person to know the fact.

(4)  A person not a partner is deemed:

(a)  to know of a limitation on authority to transfer real property as provided in Subsection 48-1d-303(7); and

(b)  to have notice of:

(i)  a partner's dissociation 90 days after a statement of dissociation under Section 48-1d-804 becomes effective; and

(ii)  a partnership's:

(A)  dissolution 90 days after a statement of dissolution under Subsection 48-1d-902(2)(b)(i) becomes effective;

(B)  termination 90 days after a statement of termination under Subsection 48-1d-902(2)(b)(vi) becomes effective;

(C)  participation in a merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication 90 days after a statement of merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication under Part 10, Merger, Interest Exchange, Conversion, and Domestication, becomes effective; and

(D)  abandonment of a merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication 90 days after a statement of abandonment of merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication under Part 10, Merger, Interest Exchange, Conversion, and Domestication, becomes effective.

(5)  A partner's knowledge or notice of a fact relating to the partnership is effective immediately as knowledge of or notice to the partnership, except in the case of a fraud on the partnership committed by or with the consent of that partner.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

